California statutes. Water Code
(B) The ability of the agricultural water supplier to obtain or use additional water supplies during drought conditions.

(C) A description of other actions planned for implementation to improve drought resilience.

(b) Drought response planning, including all of the following:

(1) Policies and a process for
 declaring a water shortage and for implementing water shortage allocations and related response actions.

(2) Methods and procedures for the enforcement or appeal of, or exemption from, triggered shortage response actions.

(3) Methods and procedures for monitoring and evaluation of the effectiveness of the drought plan.

(4) Communication protocols and procedures to inform and coordinate customers, the public, interested parties, and local, regional, and state government.

(5) A description of the potential impacts on the revenues, financial condition, and planned expenditures of the agricultural water supplier during drought conditions that reduce water allocations,
 and proposed measures to overcome those impacts, including reserve-level policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 16.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10827.

Agricultural water suppliers that are members of the Agricultural Water Management Council, and that submit water management plans to that council in accordance with the “Memorandum of Understanding Regarding Efficient Water Management Practices By Agricultural Water Suppliers In California,” dated January 1, 1999, may submit the water management plans identifying water demand management measures currently being implemented, or scheduled for implementation, to satisfy the requirements of Section 10826.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10828.

(a) Agricultural water suppliers that are required to submit water conservation plans to the United States Bureau of Reclamation pursuant to either the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Public Law 102-575) or the Reclamation Reform Act of 1982, or both, may submit those water conservation plans to satisfy the requirements of Section 10826, if both of the following apply:

(1) The agricultural water supplier has adopted and submitted the water conservation plan to the United States Bureau of Reclamation within the previous four years.

(2) The United States Bureau of Reclamation has accepted the water conservation plan as
 adequate.

(b) This part does not require agricultural water suppliers that are required to submit water conservation plans to the United States Bureau of Reclamation pursuant to either the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Public Law 102-575) or the Reclamation Reform Act of 1982, or both, to prepare and adopt water conservation plans according to a schedule that is different from that required by the United States Bureau of Reclamation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10829.

An agricultural water supplier may satisfy the requirements of this part by adopting an urban water management plan pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) or by participation in areawide, regional, watershed, or basinwide water management planning if those plans meet or exceed the requirements of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adoption and Implementation of Plans [10840. - 10845.]

10840.

Every agricultural water supplier shall prepare its plan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10825).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

Prior to adopting a plan, the agricultural water supplier shall make the proposed plan available for public inspection, and shall hold a public hearing on the plan. Prior to the hearing, notice of the time and place of hearing shall be published within the jurisdiction of the publicly owned agricultural water supplier pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. A privately owned agricultural water supplier shall provide an equivalent notice within its service area and shall provide a reasonably equivalent opportunity that would otherwise be afforded through a public hearing process for interested parties to provide input on the plan. After the hearing, the plan shall be adopted as prepared or as modified during or after the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10842.

An agricultural water supplier shall implement the plan adopted pursuant to this chapter in accordance with the schedule set forth in its plan, as determined by the governing body of the agricultural water supplier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10843.

(a) An agricultural water supplier shall submit to the entities identified in subdivision (b) a copy of its plan no later than 30 days after review of the plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10820.

(b) An agricultural water supplier shall submit a copy of its plan to each of the following entities:

(1) The department.

(2) Any city, county, or city and county within which the agricultural water supplier provides water supplies.

(3) Any groundwater management entity within which jurisdiction
 the agricultural water supplier extracts or provides water supplies.

(4) The California State Library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 17.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10844.

(a) Not later than 30 days after the date of adopting its plan, the agricultural water supplier shall make the plan available for public review on the agricultural water supplier’s Internet Web site.

(b) An agricultural water supplier that does not have an Internet Web site shall submit to the department, not later than 30 days after the date of adopting its plan, a copy of the adopted plan in an electronic format. The department shall make the plan available for public review on the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10845.

(a) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, on or before April 30, 2022, and thereafter in the years ending in seven and years ending in two, a report summarizing the status of the plans adopted pursuant to this part.

(b) The report prepared by the department shall identify the outstanding elements of any plan adopted pursuant to this part. The report shall include an evaluation of the effectiveness of this part in promoting efficient agricultural water management practices and recommendations relating to proposed changes to this part, as appropriate.

(c) The department shall provide a copy of the report to each agricultural
 water supplier that has submitted its plan to the
 department. The department shall also prepare reports and provide data for any legislative hearing designed to consider the effectiveness of plans submitted pursuant to this part.

(d) This section does not authorize the department, in preparing the report, to approve, disapprove, or critique individual plans submitted pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 18.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [10850. - 10853.]

10850.

(a) Any action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the acts or decisions of an agricultural water supplier on the grounds of noncompliance with this part shall be commenced as follows:

(1) An action or proceeding alleging failure to adopt a plan shall be commenced within 18 months after that adoption is required by this part.

(2) Any action or proceeding alleging that a plan, or action taken pursuant to the plan, does not comply with this part shall be commenced within 120 days after submitting the plan or amendments to the plan to entities in accordance with Section 10844 or the taking of that action.

(b) In an action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a plan, or an action taken pursuant to the plan by an agricultural water supplier, on the grounds of noncompliance with this part, the inquiry shall extend only to whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the agricultural water supplier has not proceeded in a manner required by law, or if the action by the agricultural water supplier is not supported by substantial evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) does not apply to the preparation and adoption of plans pursuant to this part. This part does not exempt projects for implementation of the plan or for expanded or additional water supplies from the California Environmental Quality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.

An agricultural water supplier is not eligible for a water grant or loan awarded or administered by the state unless the supplier complies with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

An agricultural water supplier that provides water to less than 25,000 irrigated acres, excluding recycled water, shall not be required to implement the requirements of this part or Part 2.55 (commencing with Section 10608) unless sufficient funding has specifically been provided to that water supplier for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 236.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.9. EFFICIENT WATER MANAGEMENT PRACTICES FOR AGRICULTURAL WATER SUPPLIERS [10900. - 10904.]

10900.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Agricultural Water Suppliers Efficient Water Management Practices Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Agriculture is a vital industry in California.

(b) The waters of the state are a limited and renewable resource.

(c) Agriculture has already implemented many improvements to water use efficiency.

(d) Implementation of additional water management practices could further improve agricultural water use efficiency in many areas.

(e) In many areas agricultural water suppliers are already carrying out water management practices to improve the efficiency of water use.

(f) Agricultural water suppliers can implement efficient water management practices for the delivery of water and can assist their users to improve the efficiency of their use of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern construction of this part.

(a) “Agricultural water supplier” or “supplier” means a supplier, either publicly or privately owned, supplying water, regardless of the basis of right, for agricultural purposes.

(b) “Efficient water management practices” means reasonable and economically justifiable programs to improve the delivery and use of water used for agricultural purposes.

(c) “Water conservation” means the reduction of the amount of water irretrievably lost to saline sinks, moisture-deficient soils, water surface evaporation, or noncrop evapotranspiration in the process of satisfying an existing beneficial use achieved either by improving the technology or method for diverting, transporting, applying, or recovering the water or by implementation of other conservation methods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10903.

(a) The department shall establish an advisory committee comprised of representatives of the California farming community, agricultural water suppliers, the department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the University of California, the California State University, public interest groups, and other interested parties.

(b) The department shall periodically review potential efficient water management practices to determine which are feasible to achieve water conservation, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 10902.

(c) The department may carry out cooperative studies of the effectiveness and efficiency of potential water management practices and implemented efficient water management practices to provide the basis for future recommendations.

(d) Nothing in this part shall be construed to affect water rights.

(e) The department shall consult with the advisory committee in carrying out its periodic reviews and conducting studies of water management practices as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10904.

(a) The department shall offer assistance to agricultural water suppliers to implement efficient water management practices to improve the efficiency of water use.

(b) Assistance offered by the department shall include, but not be limited to, technical consultation and training in methods to deliver water to farmers based on their actual water needs, evaluating and recommending improvements to the uniformity with which water is applied, advising farmers on the optimum quantities of water to apply and when to apply it, and any other technologies or management methods to improve the efficiency of water use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.10. WATER SUPPLY PLANNING TO SUPPORT EXISTING AND PLANNED FUTURE USES  [10910. - 10915.]

10910.

(a) Any city or county that determines that a project, as defined in Section 10912, is subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) under Section 21080 of the Public Resources Code shall comply with this part.

(b) The city or county, at the time that it determines whether an environmental impact report, a negative declaration, or a mitigated negative declaration is required for any project subject to the California Environmental Quality Act pursuant to Section 21080.1 of the Public Resources Code, shall identify any water system whose service area includes the project site and any water system adjacent
 to the project site that is, or may become as a result of supplying water to the project identified pursuant to this subdivision, a public water system, as defined in Section 10912, that may supply water for the project. If the city or county is not able to identify any public water system that may supply water for the project, the city or county shall prepare the water assessment required by this part after consulting with any entity serving domestic water supplies whose service area includes the project site, the local agency formation commission, and any public water system adjacent to the project site.

(c) (1) The city or county, at the time it makes the determination required under Section 21080.1 of the Public Resources Code, shall request each public water system identified pursuant to subdivision (b) to
 determine whether the projected water demand associated with a proposed project was included as part of the most recently adopted urban water management plan adopted pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610).

(2) If the projected water demand associated with the proposed project was accounted for in the most recently adopted urban water management plan, the public water system may incorporate the requested information from the urban water management plan in preparing the elements of the assessment required to comply with subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g).

(3) If the projected water demand associated with the proposed project was not accounted for in the most recently adopted urban water management plan, or the public water system has no urban water management plan, the
 water supply assessment for the project shall include a discussion with regard to whether the public water system’s total projected water supplies available during normal, single dry, and multiple dry water years during a 20-year projection will meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project, in addition to the public water system’s existing and planned future uses, including agricultural and manufacturing uses.

(4) If the city or county is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), the water supply assessment for the project shall include a discussion with regard to whether the total projected water supplies, determined to be available by the city or county for the project during normal, single dry, and multiple dry water years during a 20-year projection, will meet the projected water demand
 associated with the proposed project, in addition to existing and planned future uses, including agricultural and manufacturing uses.

(d) (1) The assessment required by this section shall include an identification of any existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts relevant to the identified water supply for the proposed project, and a description of the quantities of water received in prior years by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), under the existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts.

(2) An identification of existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts held by the public
 water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall be demonstrated by providing information related to all of the following:

(A) Written contracts or other proof of entitlement to an identified water supply.

(B) Copies of a capital outlay program for financing the delivery of a water supply that has been adopted by the public water system.

(C) Federal, state, and local permits for construction of necessary infrastructure associated with delivering the water supply.

(D) Any necessary regulatory approvals that are required in order to be able to convey or deliver the water supply.

(e) If no water has been received in prior years by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), under the existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts, the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall also include in its water supply assessment pursuant to subdivision (c), an identification of the other public water systems or water service
 contractholders that receive a water supply or have existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts, to the same source of water as the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has identified as a source of water supply within its water supply assessments.

(f) If a water supply for a proposed project includes groundwater, the following additional information shall be included in the water supply assessment:

(1) A review of any information contained in the urban water management plan relevant to the identified water supply for the proposed project.

(2) (A) A description of any
 groundwater basin or basins from which the proposed project will be supplied.

(B) For those basins for which a court or the board has adjudicated the rights to pump groundwater, a copy of the order or decree adopted by the court or the board and a description of the amount of groundwater the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has the legal right to pump under the order or decree.

(C) For a basin that has not been adjudicated that is a basin designated as high- or medium-priority pursuant to Section 10722.4, information regarding the following:

(i) Whether the department has identified the basin as being subject to critical conditions
 of overdraft pursuant to Section 12924.

(ii) If a groundwater sustainability agency has adopted a groundwater sustainability plan or has an approved alternative, a copy of that alternative or plan.

(D) For a basin that has not been adjudicated that is a basin designated as low- or very low priority pursuant to Section 10722.4, information as to whether the department has identified the basin or basins as overdrafted or has projected that the basin will become overdrafted if present management conditions continue, in the most current bulletin of the department that characterizes the condition of the groundwater basin, and a detailed description by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), of the efforts being
 undertaken in the basin or basins to eliminate the long-term overdraft condition.

(3) A detailed description and analysis of the amount and location of groundwater pumped by the public water system, or
 the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), for the past five years from any groundwater basin from which the proposed project will be supplied. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.

(4) A detailed description and analysis of the amount and location of groundwater that is projected to be pumped by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), from any basin from which the proposed project will be supplied. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.

(5) An analysis of the sufficiency of the groundwater from the basin or basins from which the proposed project will be supplied to meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project. A water supply assessment shall not be required to include the information required by this paragraph if the public water system determines, as part of the review required by paragraph (1), that the sufficiency of groundwater necessary to meet the initial and projected water demand associated with the project was addressed in the description and analysis required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 10631.

(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the governing body of each public water system shall submit the assessment to the city or county not later than 90 days from the date on which the
 request was received. The governing body of each public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this act pursuant to subdivision (b), shall approve the assessment prepared pursuant to this section at a regular or special meeting.

(2) Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period, if the public water system intends to request an extension of time to prepare and adopt the assessment, the public water system shall meet with the city or county to request an extension of time, which shall not exceed 30 days, to prepare and adopt the assessment.

(3) If the public water system fails to request an extension of time, or fails to submit the assessment notwithstanding the extension of time granted pursuant to paragraph (2), the city or county may seek a writ
 of mandamus to compel the governing body of the public water system to comply with the requirements of this part relating to the submission of the water supply assessment.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if a project has been the subject of a water supply assessment that complies with the requirements of this part, no additional water supply assessment shall be required for subsequent projects that were part of a larger project for which a water supply assessment was completed and that has complied with the requirements of this part and for which the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has concluded that its water supplies are sufficient to meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project, in addition to the
 existing and planned future uses, including, but not limited to, agricultural and industrial uses, unless one or more of the following changes occurs:

(1) Changes in the project that result in a substantial increase in water demand for the project.

(2) Changes in the circumstances or conditions substantially affecting the ability of the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), to provide a sufficient supply of water for the project.

(3) Significant new information becomes available that was not known and could not have been known at the time when the assessment was prepared.

(i) For
 the purposes of this section, hauled water is not considered as a source of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 19.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10911.

(a) If, as a result of its assessment, the public water system concludes that its water supplies are, or will be, insufficient, the public water system shall provide to the city or county its plans for acquiring additional water supplies, setting forth the measures that are being undertaken to acquire and develop those water supplies. If the city or county, if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), concludes as a result of its assessment, that water supplies are, or will be, insufficient, the city or county shall include in its water supply assessment its plans for acquiring additional water supplies, setting forth the measures that are being undertaken to acquire and develop those water supplies. Those plans may include, but are not limited to, information concerning all of the following:

(1) The estimated total costs, and the proposed method of financing the costs, associated with acquiring the additional water supplies.

(2) All federal, state, and local permits, approvals, or entitlements that are anticipated to be required in order to acquire and develop the additional water supplies.

(3) Based on the considerations set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), the estimated timeframes within which the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), expects to be able to acquire additional water supplies.

(b) The city or county shall include the water supply assessment provided pursuant to Section 10910, and any information provided pursuant to subdivision (a), in any environmental document prepared for the project pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) The city or county may include in any environmental document an evaluation of any information included in that environmental document provided pursuant to subdivision (b). The city or county shall determine, based on the entire record, whether projected water supplies will be sufficient to satisfy the demands of the project, in addition to existing and planned future uses. If the city or county determines that water supplies will not be sufficient, the city or county shall include that determination in its findings for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 643, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10912.

For the purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Project” means any of the following:

(1) A proposed residential development of more than 500 dwelling units.

(2) A proposed shopping center or business establishment employing more than 1,000 persons or having more than 500,000 square feet of floor space.

(3) A proposed commercial office building employing more than 1,000 persons or having more than 250,000 square feet of floor space.

(4) A proposed hotel
 or motel, or both, having more than 500 rooms.

(5) A proposed industrial, manufacturing, or processing plant, or industrial park planned to house more than 1,000 persons, occupying more than 40 acres of land, or having more than 650,000 square feet of floor area.

(6) A mixed-use project that includes one or more of the projects specified in this subdivision.

(7) A project that would demand an amount of water equivalent to, or greater than, the amount of water required by a 500 dwelling unit project.

(b) If a public water system has fewer than 5,000 service connections, then “project” means any proposed residential, business, commercial, hotel or motel, or industrial development that would account for an increase of 10 percent or more in the number of
 the public water system’s existing service connections, or a mixed-use project that would demand an amount of water equivalent to, or greater than, the amount of water required by residential development that would represent an increase of 10 percent or more in the number of the public water system’s existing service connections.

(c) “Public water system” means a system for the provision of piped water to the public for human consumption that has 3,000 or more service connections. A public water system includes all of the following:

(1) Any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facility under control of the operator of the system that is used primarily in connection with the system.

(2) Any collection or pretreatment storage facility not under the control of the operator that is used primarily in
 connection with the system.

(3) Any person who treats water on behalf of one or more public water systems for the purpose of rendering it safe for human consumption.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 588, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (AB 2561)   Effective September 26, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10914.

(a) Nothing in this part is intended to create a right or entitlement to water service or any specific level of water service.

(b) Nothing in this part is intended to either impose, expand, or limit any duty concerning the obligation of a public water system to provide certain service to its existing customers or to any future potential customers.

(c) Nothing in this part is intended to modify or otherwise change existing law with respect to projects which are not subject to this part.

(d) This part applies only to a project for which a notice of preparation is submitted on or after January 1, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 881, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10915.

The County of San Diego is deemed to comply with this part if the Office of Planning and Research determines that all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) Proposition C, as approved by the voters of the County of San Diego in November 1988, requires the development of a regional growth management plan and directs the establishment of a regional planning and growth management review board.

(b) The County of San Diego and the cities in the county, by agreement, designate the San Diego Association of Governments as that review board.

(c) A regional growth management strategy that provides for a comprehensive regional strategy and a coordinated economic development and growth management program has been developed pursuant to Proposition C.

(d) The regional growth management strategy includes a water element to coordinate planning for water that is consistent with the requirements of this part.

(e) The San Diego County Water Authority, by agreement with the San Diego Association of Governments in its capacity as the review board, uses the association’s most recent regional growth forecasts for planning purposes and to implement the water element of the strategy.

(f) The procedures established by the review board for the development and approval of the regional growth management strategy, including the water element and any certification process established to ensure that a project is consistent with that element, comply with the requirements of this part.

(g) The environmental documents for a project located in the County of San Diego include information that accomplishes the same purposes as a water supply assessment that is prepared pursuant to Section 10910.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 643, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.11. GROUNDWATER MONITORING [10920. - 10936.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10920. - 10922.]

10920.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that on or before January 1, 2012, groundwater elevations in all groundwater basins and subbasins be regularly and systematically monitored locally and that the resulting groundwater information be made readily and widely available.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the department continue to maintain its current network of monitoring wells, including groundwater elevation and groundwater quality monitoring wells, and that the department continue to coordinate monitoring with local entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10921.

This part does not require the monitoring of groundwater elevations in an area that is not within a basin or subbasin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10922.

This part does not expand or otherwise affect the powers or duties of the department relating to groundwater beyond those expressly granted by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10925. - 10925.]

10925.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this part.

(a) “Basin” or “subbasin” means a groundwater basin or subbasin identified and defined in the department’s Bulletin No. 118.

(b) “Bulletin No. 118” means the department’s report entitled “California’s Groundwater: Bulletin 118” updated in 2003, or as it may be subsequently updated or revised in accordance with Section 12924.

(c) “Monitoring entity” means a party conducting or coordinating the monitoring of groundwater elevations pursuant to this part.

(d) “Monitoring functions” and “groundwater monitoring functions” means the monitoring of groundwater elevations, the reporting of those elevations to the department, and other related actions required by this part.

(e) “Monitoring groundwater elevations” means monitoring groundwater elevations, coordinating the monitoring of groundwater elevations, or both.

(f) “Voluntary cooperative groundwater monitoring association” means an association formed for the purposes of monitoring groundwater elevations pursuant to Section 10935.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 6 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Groundwater Monitoring Program [10927. - 10936.]

10927.

Any of the following entities may assume responsibility for monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations in all or a part of a basin or subbasin in accordance with this part:

(a) A watermaster or water management engineer appointed by a court or pursuant to statute to administer a final judgment determining rights to groundwater.

(b) (1) A groundwater management agency with statutory authority to manage groundwater pursuant to its principal act that is monitoring groundwater elevations in all or a part of a groundwater basin or subbasin on or before January 1, 2010.

(2) A water replenishment
 district established pursuant to Division 18 (commencing with Section 60000). This part does not expand or otherwise affect the authority of a water replenishment district relating to monitoring groundwater elevations.

(3) A groundwater sustainability agency with statutory authority to manage groundwater pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720).

(c) A local agency that is managing all or part of a groundwater basin or subbasin pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) and that was monitoring groundwater elevations in all or a part of a groundwater basin or subbasin on or before January 1, 2010, or a local agency or county that is managing all or part of a groundwater basin or subbasin pursuant to any other legally enforceable groundwater management plan with provisions that are substantively similar to those described in that part and that was monitoring
 groundwater elevations in all or a part of a groundwater basin or subbasin on or before January 1, 2010.

(d) A local agency that is managing all or part of a groundwater basin or subbasin pursuant to an integrated regional water management plan prepared pursuant to Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) that includes a groundwater management component that complies with the requirements of Section 10753.7.

(e) A local agency that has been collecting and reporting groundwater elevations and that does not have an adopted groundwater management plan, if the local agency adopts a groundwater management plan in accordance with Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) by January 1, 2014. The department may authorize the local agency to conduct the monitoring and reporting of groundwater elevations pursuant to this part on an interim basis, until the local agency adopts a groundwater
 management plan in accordance with Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) or until January 1, 2014, whichever occurs first.

(f) A county that is not managing all or a part of a groundwater basin or subbasin pursuant to a legally enforceable groundwater management plan with provisions that are substantively similar to those described in Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750).

(g) A voluntary cooperative groundwater monitoring association formed pursuant to Section 10935.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10928.

(a) Any entity described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 10927 that seeks to assume groundwater monitoring functions in accordance with this part shall notify the department, in writing, on or before January 1, 2011. The notification shall include all of the following information:
